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DTC P0335/ 12/13 Crankshaft Position Sensor ”A” Circuit

DTC P0339/ 13 Crankshaft Position Sensor ”A” Circuit
Intermittent

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Thecrankshaftpositionsensorsystemconsistsofacrankshaftpositionsensorplateandapick −upcoil.
Thesensorplatehas34 teethand is installedon thecrankshaft.Thepick −upcoil ismadeofan ironcore
andmagnet.Thesensorplate rotatesandaseach toothpasses through thepick −upcoil, apulsesignal is
created.Thepick −upcoil generates34signals foreachengine revolution.Basedon thesesignals, theen-
gine control ECU calculates the crankshaft position and engine RPM. Using these calculations, the fuel in-
jection time and ignition timing are controlled.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0335/12/13

No crankshaft position sensor signal to engine control ECU
during cranking (2 trip detection logic)

P0335/12/13
No crankshaft position sensor signal to engine control ECU
with engine speed 600 rpm or more (2 trip detection logic)

SOpen or short in crankshaft position sensor circuit

P0339/13

Incondition (a), (b)and (c),whennocrankshaftposition
sensor (NE)signal is input for0.05sec.ormore. :
(1 trip detection logic)
(f)Engine revolution1000rpmormore
(g) STA signal is OFF
(h) 3 sec. or more has lapsed after STA signal is switched

from ON to OFF.

SOpenors hort incran kshaftpos itionsensorc ircuit
SCrankshaftpositionsensor
SSignalplate

SEnginecontrolECU

Reference: Inspection using the oscilloscope.
The correct waveform is as shown.

Tester Connection Specified Condition

G2+(E7 −27) − G2− (E7−32)
C t f i h

NE+(E7 −25) − NE− (E7−24)
Correctwaveform isasshown
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MONITOR DESCRIPTION
If there is no signal from the crankshaft sensor even though the engine is revolving, the engine control ECU
interprets this as a malfunction of the sensor.
This monitor runs for 10 seconds (the first 10 seconds of engine idle) after the engine is started.

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
S Read freeze framedatausing thehand −held tester.Freeze framedata records theengineconditions

when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was runningorstopped. theenginewaswarmedupornot, theair −fuel ratio leanor rich,etc.at the
time of the malfunction.

S READVALUEOFHAND −HELDTESTEROROBDIISCANTOOL
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Start theengineandpush thehand −held testeror theOBDIIscan toolmainswitchON.
(c) Select the item ”DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / ENGINE SPD”.
S Theenginespeedcanbeconfirmed inDATALISTusing thehand −held tester. If there isnoNEsignals

from the crankshaft position sensor despite the engine revolving, the engine speed will be indicated
as zero. If voltage output of the crankshaft position sensor is insufficient, the engine speed will be indi-
cated as lower RPM (than the actual RPM).

1 Checkresistanceofcrankshaftpositionsensor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the C4 crankshaft position sensor connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between terminals 1 and 2.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

1 − 2 1,850 to2,450 � (at20 ˚ C(68 ˚ F))

NG Replace crankshaft position sensor.

OK
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2 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU
and crankshaft position sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the C4 crankshaft position sensor connector.
(b) Disconnect the E9 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

Crankshaftpositionsensor (C4 −1) −
NE+(E9 −25)

Below1 �

Crankshaftpositionsensor (C4 −2) −
NE− (E9−24)

Below1 �

Crankshaftpositionsensor (C4 −1)or
NE+(E9 −25) − Bodyground

10k � orhigher

Crankshaftpositionsensor (C4 −2)or
NE− (E9−24) − Bodyground

10k � orhigher

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

3 Check sensor installation (crankshaft position sensor).

CHECK:
Check the crankshaft position sensor installation.

NG Tighten sensor.

OK
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4 Inspect teeth of sensor plate.

PREPARATION:
Remove the crankshaft angle sensor plate (See Pub. No. RM630E, page EM−14).
CHECK:
Check the teeth of sensor plate.

NG Replace sensor plate.

OK

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI−74).


